src/fastspell_dictionaries/sc_IT.aff
SFX J Y 69
SFX J ai u [^i]ai  #  istimu
SFX J ai as [^i]ai  #  istimas
SFX J ai at [^i]ai  #  istimat
SFX J ai ant [^i]ai  #  istimant
SFX J u as iu # abbàscias - assélias
SFX J u at iu # abbàsciat
SFX J u ant iu # abbàsciant
SFX J ai aus ai  #  istim aus - abbasci aus - asseli aus
SFX J ai ais ai  
SFX J ai amu ai
SFX J ai asta ai
SFX J ai àst ai
SFX J ai ada ai
SFX J ai àt ai
SFX J ai amus ai
SFX J ai astis ai
SFX J ai astus ai
SFX J ai anta ai
SFX J ai ànt ai
SFX J ai eus [^cgi]ai  #  chi istimeus
SFX J ai eis [^cgi]ai  #  chi istimeis
SFX J iai eus [cg]iai  #  chi abasceus ; disigeus ; pramaceus
SFX J iai eis [cg]iai  #  chi abasceis
SFX J ai eus [^cg]iai  #  chi asselieus
SFX J ai eis [^cg]iai  #  chi asselieis
SFX J ai hi [cg]ai  #  chi pechi, paghi
SFX J ai his [cg]ai  #  chi pechis, paghis
SFX J ai hist [cg]ai  #  chi pechist, paghist
SFX J ai hit [cg]ai  #  chi pechit, paghit
SFX J ai heus [cg]ai  #  chi pecheus, pagheus
SFX J ai heis [cg]ai  #  chi pecheis, pagheis
SFX J ai hint [cg]ai  #  chi pechint, paghint
SFX J ai essi [^cgi]ai  #  chi istimessi
SFX J ai essis [^cgi]ai  #  chi istimessis
SFX J ai essit [^cgi]ai  #  chi istimessit
SFX J ai éssimus [^cgi]ai  #  chi istiméssimus
SFX J ai estis [^cgi]ai  #  chi istimestis
SFX J ai essint [^cgi]ai  #  chi istimessint
SFX J iai essi iai  #  chi abascessi
SFX J iai essis [cg]iai  #  chi abascessis
SFX J iai essit [cg]iai  #  chi abascessit
SFX J iai éssimus [cg]iai  #  chi abascéssimus
SFX J iai estis [cg]iai  #  chi abascestis
SFX J iai essint [cg]iai  #  chi abascessint
SFX J ai essi [^cg]iai  #  chi abascessi
SFX J ai essis [^cg]iai  #  chi abascessis
SFX J ai essit [^cg]iai  #  chi abascessit
SFX J ai éssimus [^cg]iai  #  chi abascéssimus
SFX J ai estis [^cg]iai  #  chi abascéstis
SFX J ai essint [^cg]iai  #  chi abascessint
SFX J ai hessi [cg]ai  #  chi pechessi, paghessi
SFX J ai hessis [cg]ai  #  chi pechessis, paghessis
SFX J ai hessit [cg]ai  #  chi pechessit, paghessit
SFX J ai héssimus [cg]ai  #  chi pechéssimus, paghéssimus
SFX J ai hestis [cg]ai  #  chi pechestis, paghestis
SFX J ai hessint [cg]ai  #  chi pechessint, paghessint
SFX J ai issí [cg]ai  #  istimissí, pighissí
SFX J ai au ai  #  istimau
SFX J ai ada ai  #  istimada
SFX J ai aus ai  #  istimaus
SFX J ai adas ai  #  istimadas
SFX J ai endi/def [^cgi]ai
SFX J ai endu/def [^cgi]ai
SFX J ai hendi/def [cg]ai
SFX J ai hendu/def [cg]ai
SFX J iai endi/def [cg]iai
SFX J iai endu/def [cg]iai
SFX J ai endi/def [^cg]iai
SFX J ai endu/def [^cg]iai

SFX k Y 3
SFX k ai a/def [^i]ai  #  istima
SFX k u a u  #  abàscia 
SFX k ai ai/def ai  #  istimaimí

SFX u Y 14
SFX u ai i [^cgi]ai  #  chi istimi
SFX u ai is [^cgi]ai  #  chi istimis
SFX u ai ist [^cgi]ai  #  chi istimist
SFX u ai it [^cgi]ai  #  chi istimit
SFX u ai int [^cgi]ai  #  chi istimint
SFX u iai i iai  #   chi asseli
SFX u iai is iai  #  
SFX u iai ist iai  #  
SFX u iai it iai  #  
SFX u iai int iai  #  
SFX u i is [rs]i # chi lessis - neris
SFX u i ist [rs]i #
SFX u i it [rs]i #
SFX u i int [rs]i # 

# K
# Prima coniugazione in -are (solu var. nug./brabaxinas)
SFX K Y 137
SFX K are o are  #  istimo
SFX K are as are  #  istimas
SFX K are at are  #  istimat
SFX K are amus are  #  istimamus
SFX K are aes are  #  istimaes
SFX K are ates are  #  istimates
SFX K are ant are  #  istimant
SFX K are abo are
SFX K are aio are
SFX K are ao are
SFX K are avo are
SFX K are abas are
SFX K are aias are
SFX K are ais are
SFX K are avas are
SFX K are abat are
SFX K are aiat are
SFX K are ait are
SFX K are avat are
SFX K are abamus are
SFX K are aiamus are
SFX K are àimus are
SFX K are avamus are
SFX K are abazes are
SFX K are aiatzes are
SFX K are àizis are
SFX K are avazes are
SFX K are abant are
SFX K are aiant are
SFX K are aint are
SFX K are avant are
SFX K are e are  #  chi istime
SFX K are es are  #  chi istimes
SFX K are et are  #  chi isse istimet
SFX K are emas are  #  chi istimemas 
SFX K are emus are  #  chi istimemus
SFX K are edas are  #  chi istimedas
SFX K are etas are  #  chi istimetas
SFX K are ezas are  #  chi istimezas 
SFX K are ent are  #  chi istiment 
SFX K are he [cg]are  #  chi pache, lighe
SFX K are hes [cg]are  #  chi paches, lighes
SFX K are het [cg]are  #  chi pachet, lighet
SFX K are hemas [cg]are  #  chi pachemas, lighemas
SFX K are hemus [cg]are  #  chi pachemus, lighemus 
SFX K are hedas [cg]are  #  chi pachedas, lighedas
SFX K are hetas [cg]are  #  chi pachetas
SFX K are hezas [cg]are  #  chi pachezas, lighezas
SFX K are hent [cg]are  #  chi pachent, lighent
SFX K are àrepo are  #  chi istimàrepo 
SFX K are ares are  #  chi istimares
SFX K are aret are  #  chi istimaret
SFX K are àremus are  #  chi istimàremus
SFX K are aremus are  #  chi istimeremus 
SFX K are àrezis are  #  chi istimàrezis 
SFX K are arezis are  #  chi istimerezis
SFX K are arezes are  #  chi istimarent  
SFX K are arent are  #  chi istimerent 
SFX K are a are  #  istima
SFX K are ae are  #  istimae
SFX K are ate are  #  istimate
SFX K are àdemi are  #  istimàdemi
SFX K are àemi are  #  istimàemi
SFX K are àtemi are  #  istimàtemi
SFX K are àdebbos are  #  istimàdebbos
SFX K are àebbos are  #  istimàebbos
SFX K are àtebbos are  #  istimàtebbos
SFX K are àdennos are  #  istimàdennos
SFX K are àennos are  #  istimàennos
SFX K are àtennos are  #  istimàtennos
SFX K are àdela are  #  istimàdela
SFX K are àela are  #  istimàela
SFX K are àtela are  #  istimàtela
SFX K are àdelas are  #  istimàdelas
SFX K are àelas are  #  istimàelas
SFX K are àtelas are  #  istimàtelas
SFX K are àdelu are  #  istimàdelu
SFX K are àelu are  #  istimàelu
SFX K are àtelu are  #  istimàtelu
SFX K are àdelos are  #  istimàdelos
SFX K are àelos are  #  istimàelos
SFX K are àtelos are  #  istimàtelos
SFX K are adu are  #  istimadu
SFX K are atu are  #  istimatu
SFX K are au are  #  istimau
SFX K are ados are  #  istimados
SFX K are atos are  #  istimatos
SFX K are aos are  #  istimaos
SFX K are ada are  #  istimada
SFX K are ata are  #  istimata
SFX K are adas are  #  istimadas
SFX K are atas are  #  istimatas
SFX K are andhe are
SFX K are endhe are
SFX K are enne are
SFX K are hendhe [cg]are  #  lighendhe
SFX K are henne [cg]are  #  lighenne
SFX K are àndhemi are
SFX K are ànnemi are
SFX K are hèndhemi [cg]are
SFX K are hènnemi [cg]are
SFX K are àndhedi are
SFX K are àndheti are
SFX K are ànnedi are
SFX K are ànneti are
SFX K are hèndhedi [cg]are
SFX K are hèndheti [cg]are
SFX K are hènnedi [cg]are
SFX K are hènneti [cg]are
SFX K are àndhelu are
SFX K are àndhelos are
SFX K are ànnelu are
SFX K are ànnelos are
SFX K are hèndhelu [cg]are
SFX K are hèndhelos [cg]are
SFX K are hènnelu [cg]are
SFX K are hènnelos [cg]are
SFX K are àndhela are
SFX K are àndhelas are
SFX K are ànnela are
SFX K are ànnelas are
SFX K are hèndhela [cg]are
SFX K are hèndhelas [cg]are
SFX K are hènnela [cg]are
SFX K are hènnelas [cg]are
SFX K are àndhennos are
SFX K are àndhebbos are
SFX K are ànnennos are
SFX K are ànnebbos are
SFX K are hèndhennos [cg]are
SFX K are hèndhebbos [cg]are
SFX K are hènnennos [cg]are
SFX K are hènnebbos [cg]are
SFX K are àndhesi are
SFX K are ànnesi are
SFX K are hèndhesi [cg]are
SFX K are hènnesi [cg]are
