src/fastspell_dictionaries/sc_IT.dic
abberare/Kb
abbidhiai/Jukb
abborticare/Kb
abbrentosichedhare/Kb
abbrigai/Jukb
abburgare/Kb
abidai/Jukb
acaparrare/Kb
acarcangiai/Jukb
acarcàngiu/Jukb
achingiai/Jukb
achíngiu/Jukb
acochinai/Jukb
acoconare/Kb
acocovedhai/Jukb
aconcalare/Kb
acovecai/Jukb
acovordai/Jukb
acratzare/Kb
acucutare/Kb
acúliu/Juk
aculungionai/Jukb
addopare/Kb
adotai/Jukb
adumbrai/Jukb
aficare/Kb
afillai/Jukb
afioncai/Jukb
afrodhare/Kb
afródhiu/Juk
afròngiu/Juk
afunnare/Kb
aggangare/Kb
agghilimare/Kb
aggodhetare/Kb
aggradheronare/Kb
aggranghenare/Kb
aggràtziu/Juk
aggregai/Jukb
aggromorare/Kb
aggrustare/Kb
agiogatzare/Kb
agudroai/Jukb
agurjai/Jukb
allagorjare/Kb
allecanai/Jukb
alleredhai/Jukb
allocare/Kb
alluai/Jukb
allufiai/Jukb
alluscare/Kb
ammadricare/Kb
ammaistrai/Jukb
ammaletzai/Jukb
ammanuncare/Kb
ammaticorjare/Kb
ammédiu/Juk
ammentai/Jukb
ammortichinzare/Kb
ammurigonai/Jukb
ammussolai/Jukb
annajare/Kb
anníchilu/Juk
annicrare/Kb
annischitzai/Jukb
annoai/Jukb
annuracare/Kb
apanai/Jukb
apapirare/Kb
aparíciu/Jukb
aparigai/Jukb
aperricare/Kb
apicigai/Jukb
apígiu/Juk
apillonai/Jukb
apistichizonare/Kb
aprantare/Kb
aprapiai/Jukb
aprésiu/Juk
apressiai/Jukb
aproverzare/Kb
apúngiu/Juk
aputzare/Kb
arai/Jukb
arbigai/Jukb
arraixinai/Jukb
arrampúngiu/Juk
arrancai/Jukb
arrantzare/Kb
arrecàsciu/Juk
arrefortzai/Jukb
arrefrigai/Jukb
arrenfaciai/Jukb
arreposai/Jukb
arrepranai/Jukb
arringai/Jukb
arrogliai/Jukb
arrògliu/Juk
arrumigai/Jukb
Errore!iu/Juk
articulai/Jukb
assamutare/Kb
assèdiu/Juk
assiai/Jukb
Errore!iu/Juk
assupedhare/Kb
assurbai/Jukb
asubai/Jukb
asuletai/Jukb
atitidai/Jukb
atormentai/Jukb
atortiai/Jukb
atropègliu/Jukb
atrummare/Kb
atruvullonai/Jukb
atuai/Jukb
aundai/Jukb
aventurai/Jukb
averai/Jukb
azistrare/Kb
babbiscare/Kb
bagianai/Jukb
bannitare/Kb
barbai/Jukb
bàrbiu/Juk
bertulai/Jukb
bisionai/Jukb
bisogai/Jukb
botare/Kb
brigociai/Jukb
bromigiai/Jukb
brubudhai/Jukb
bubbullicare/Kb
cacare/Kb
càgliu/Jukb
callifatai/Jukb
caltzai/Jukb
caponai/Jukb
carellai/Jukb
càriu/Juk
casticare/Kb
castigai/Jukb
certificai/Jukb
cetai/Jukb
ciamare/Kb
cingrai/Jukb
cocoillai/Jukb
codinai/Jukb
cònciu/Jukb
contipizare/Kb
contróriu/Juk
contzolai/Jukb
covacare/Kb
cracàriu/Juk
cravai/Jukb
crazugai/Jukb
cubare/Kb
cucutzare/Kb
cugliunai/Jukb
cumpassionai/Jukb
cumpèndiu/Juk
cumprobare/Kb
cuntrunnai/Jukb
currúngiu/Juk
curruxinai/Jukb
dennegai/Jukb
deretare/Kb
desogai/Jukb
desossai/Jukb
disarmai/Jukb
disdorai/Jukb
diseredai/Jukb
dissigillai/Jukb
duplicai/Jukb
duritai/Jukb
fàdiu/Juk
favedhare/Kb
feriai/Jukb
ferrai/Jukb
forrogai/Jukb
frigai/Jukb
frighígiu/Juk
frigonzare/Kb
fumai/Jukb
garronai/Jukb
gatinai/Jukb
girollai/Jukb
grúmiu/Juk
gruminai/Jukb
iberrare/Kb
idegollai/Jukb
illuminai/Jukb
illuxarrai/Jukb
imbentai/Jukb
imbolígiu/Juk
imboscai/Jukb
imbriacare/Kb
imbrollocai/Jukb
imbusciai/Jukb
imbuscinai/Jukb
impalitzai/Jukb
impíciu/Juk
impilurtzai/Jukb
impojai/Jukb
improsai/Jukb
impruinai/Jukb
incalai/Jukb
incarrognai/Jukb
incartai/Jukb
incilíxiu/Juk
incordai/Jukb
incordigliolai/Jukb
incrastai/Jukb
incurbiai/Jukb
incurpai/Jukb
indulcai/Jukb
inflochitai/Jukb
infodhinai/Jukb
infunai/Jukb
inghísciu/Juk
inghitiai/Jukb
ingrassai/Jukb
ingristare/Kb
innestai/Jukb
innischitzai/Jukb
insimbulai/Jukb
interpolai/Jukb
interrai/Jukb
intitibedhare/Kb
intrebigai/Jukb
intzerriai/Jukb
intzertai/Jukb
intzurpai/Jukb
irfassare/Kb
irfunnare/Kb
irmossichedhare/Kb
isarrogai/Jukb
isbagliai/Jukb
iscacare/Kb
iscallai/Jukb
iscarrarjare/Jukb
iscarràsciu/Jukb
iscopercare/Kb
iscorigai/Jukb
iscrocorigai/Jukb
iscròniu/Juk
iscropare/Kb
iscuntrobare/Kb
isoricrare/Kb
ispaporedhare/Kb
isparai/Jukb
ispiumai/Jukb
ispòbiu/Juk
ispriducare/Kb
issalibare/Kb
istecare/Kb
istrapatzare/Kb
Errore!iu/Juk
istripizare/Kb
itesinantai/Jukb
itzacai/Jukb
lavare/Kb
liunai/Jukb
macrare/Kb
magàngiu/Juk
maistai/Jukb
mediai/Jukb
mennare/Kb
minetzare/Kb
ministrai/Jukb
minusprèssiu/Juk
muitare/Kb
naturalizai/Jukb
necare/Kb
ocedhare/Kb
olirdai/Jukb
ondrai/Jukb
parmitzare/Kb
paurai/Jukb
pibinai/Jukb
pibiristai/Jukb
pilissare/Kb
pistazare/Kb
postemai/Jukb
pragastare/Kb
princípiu/Juk
privilegiai/Jukb
rancidai/Jukb
refrenai/Jukb
refudai/Jukb
ricatai/Jukb
roghinare/Kb
salàriu/Juk
saliai/Jukb
sbentulai/Jukb
sbúriu/Jukb
sbussai/Jukb
scantusciai/Jukb
scarronai/Jukb
scarrugai/Jukb
schiu/Juk
sciampúgiu/Juk
sciampulai/Jukb
scitorai/Jukb
scolovetai/Jukb
scomputai/Jukb
scotiai/Jukb
scrostai/Jukb
scroxai/Jukb
scurrellai/Jukb
seidai/Jukb
semenai/Jukb
sfollai/Jukb
sgurdai/Jukb
sicai/Jukb
sinzalare/Kb
slutai/Jukb
sotai/Jukb
sovrastimai/Jukb
sparpalociai/Jukb
spetúrriu/Juk
spiai/Jukb
spirònciu/Juk
sprefàgliu/Juk
spreitzai/Jukb
spulighitai/Jukb
stidòngiu/Juk
stimai/Jukb
stragai/Jukb
strobbai/Jukb
strobillicai/Jukb
stumbai/Jukb
Errore!iu/Juk
svirginai/Jukb
terrare/Kb
tèsseru/Jukm
travai/Jukb
travessai/Jukb
trullai/Jukb
truvare/Kb
umidai/Jukb
umíliu/Juk
voretai/Jukb
zocare/Kb
